Alabama, session 2026rs, HB420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-11-61.1, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§13A-11-61.1
(a) No person shall shoot or discharge a firearm into
an occupied or unoccupied school bus or school building.
(1) A person who shoots or discharges a firearm into an
occupied school bus or school building shall be guilty of a
Class B Class A felony.
(2) A person who shoots or discharges a firearm into an
unoccupied school bus or school building shall be guilty of a
Class C felony.
(b) No person shall shoot or discharge a firearm on
school property.
(1) A person who shoots or discharges a firearm on
school property during school hours or during school
activities after school hours, shall be guilty of a Class B
felony.
(2) In circumstances other than those provided in
subdivision (1), a person who shoots or discharges a firearm
on school property shall be guilty of a Class C felony.
(c) A person shall not be in violation of this section
Page 1

(c) A person shall not be in violation of this section
HB420 Enrolled
if the person is justified in using physical force pursuant to
Section 13A-3-23.
(d) A person shall not be in violation of this section
if he or she is engaging in an organized competition or school
system sanctioned system-sanctioned event involving the use of
a firearm or participating in or practicing for a performance
by an organized group under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) which uses
firearms as part of the performance or is on land leased from
a school system.
(e) For the purposes of this section, "school property"
does not include sixteenth section land or school lands,
pursuant to Section 16-20-1, held in trust for the benefit of
a school district, that do not have any school buildings, and
that is are not actively used for the purpose of providing
educational or recreational activities to students.
(f) A person shall not be in violation of this section
if he or she is under 19 years of age.
(g)(f) This section shall not be construed to repeal
other criminal laws. Whenever conduct prescribed by any
provision of this section is also prescribed by any other
provision of law, the provision which carries the more serious
penalty shall be applied."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB420 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3